Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1000.
do enact as follows:AB1000,15Section 1. 15.205 (4) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1000,2,4115.205 (4) Child abuse and neglect prevention Strengthening families 2board. (intro.) There is created a child abuse and neglect prevention 3strengthening families board which is attached to the department of children and 4families under s. 15.03. The board shall consist of 20 members as follows:AB1000,25Section 2. 20.433 (intro.) and (1) (g) of the statutes are amended to read:AB1000,2,8620.433 Child abuse and neglect prevention Strengthening families 7board. (intro.) There is appropriated to the child abuse and neglect prevention 8strengthening families board for the following program:AB1000,2,209(1) (g) General program operations. From all moneys received under s. 69.22 10(1m), the amounts in the schedule to be used for the expenses of the child abuse and 11neglect prevention strengthening families board under s. 48.982 (2) and (3), for 12statewide projects under s. 48.982 (5), for the general program operations of the 13family resource center grant program under s. 48.982 (6), and for technical 14assistance to organizations under s. 48.982 (4) and (6). Notwithstanding s. 20.001 15(3) (a), there is transferred from this appropriation account to the appropriation 16account under par. (h) all moneys in this appropriation account that are 17unexpended and unencumbered at the close of a fiscal year. The child abuse and 18neglect prevention strengthening families board may transfer all moneys in this 19appropriation account that are unexpended and unencumbered to the 20appropriation account under par. (h) at any time.AB1000,321Section 3. 48.651 (1d) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1000,3,52248.651 (1d) (a) The department shall promulgate rules establishing 23standards for the certification of child care providers under sub. (1). The 24department shall consult with the child abuse and neglect prevention 1strengthening families board before promulgating those rules. In establishing the 2requirements under this paragraph for certification of a child care provider, the 3department shall include a requirement that all providers and all employees and 4volunteers of a provider who provide care and supervision for children receive the 5minimum health and safety training required under par. (b).AB1000,46Section 4. 48.67 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 7Act 15, is amended to read:AB1000,3,17848.67 (1m) (intro.) The department shall promulgate rules establishing 9minimum requirements for the issuance of licenses to, and establishing standards 10for the operation of, child welfare agencies, child care centers, foster homes, group 11homes, shelter care facilities, and county departments. Those rules shall be 12designed to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the children in 13the care of all licensees. The department shall consult with the department of 14safety and professional services, the department of public instruction, and the child 15abuse and neglect prevention strengthening families board before promulgating 16those rules. For foster homes, those rules shall include the rules promulgated 17under s. 48.62 (8). Those rules shall include rules that require all of the following:AB1000,518Section 5. 48.982 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1000,3,201948.982 (title) Child abuse and neglect prevention Strengthening 20families board.AB1000,621Section 6. 48.982 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1000,3,232248.982 (1) (b) “Board” means the child abuse and neglect prevention 23strengthening families board.AB1000,724Section 7. 253.15 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1000,4,21253.15 (1) (a) “Board” means the child abuse and neglect prevention 2strengthening families board.AB1000,4,33